src/fst/morphology/affixes/quantifiers.lexc
LEXICON Quants3
!Cx PossPx Tx PredPx K
!Cases1 Possessives1 Tenses1 PredPersons1 Ks
+Sg+Nom+Indef: CLT/COP_SG ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}з%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>з%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Indef+Lat:%>%{оеэØ%}в Ks ;
!+Indef+Lat:%>в Ks ;


+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:%>м _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:%>т%{ЬØ%} _KIT-Tenses1 ;
@P.KLOSS.ON@+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:@P.KLOSS.ON@%>н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-Tenses1 ;
@P.KLOSS.ON@+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:@P.KLOSS.ON@%>нк _LAK-Tenses1 ;
@P.TLOSS.ON@+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:@P.TLOSS.ON@%>ст _KIT-Tenses1 ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}м _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} _KIT-Tenses1 ;
@P.KLOSS.ON@+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:@P.KLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-Tenses1 ;
@P.KLOSS.ON@+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:@P.KLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}нк _LAK-Tenses1 ;
@P.TLOSS.ON@+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:@P.TLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}ст _KIT-Tenses1 ;

+Pl+Nom+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}м _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} _KIT-Tenses1 ;
@P.KLOSS.ON@+Pl+Nom+PxPl1:@P.KLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-Tenses1 ;
@P.KLOSS.ON@+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:@P.KLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}нк _LAK-Tenses1 ;
@P.TLOSS.ON@+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:@P.TLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}ст _KIT-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}м _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} _KIT-Tenses1 ;
@P.KLOSS.ON@+Pl+Nom+PxPl1:@P.KLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-Tenses1 ;
@P.KLOSS.ON@+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:@P.KLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}нк _LAK-Tenses1 ;
@P.TLOSS.ON@+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:@P.TLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}ст _KIT-Tenses1 ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}м _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} _KIT-Tenses1 ;
@P.KLOSS.ON@+Sg+Gen+PxPl1:@P.KLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-Tenses1 ;
@P.KLOSS.ON@+Sg+Gen+PxPl2:@P.KLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}нк _LAK-Tenses1 ;
@P.TLOSS.ON@+Sg+Gen+PxPl3:@P.TLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}ст _KIT-Tenses1 ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}м _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} _KIT-Tenses1 ;
@P.KLOSS.ON@+Sg+Gen+PxPl1:@P.KLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-Tenses1 ;
@P.KLOSS.ON@+Sg+Gen+PxPl2:@P.KLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}нк _LAK-Tenses1 ;
@P.TLOSS.ON@+Sg+Gen+PxPl3:@P.TLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}ст _KIT-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}м _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} _KIT-Tenses1 ;
@P.KLOSS.ON@+Pl+Gen+PxPl1:@P.KLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-Tenses1 ;
@P.KLOSS.ON@+Pl+Gen+PxPl2:@P.KLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}нк _LAK-Tenses1 ;
@P.TLOSS.ON@+Pl+Gen+PxPl3:@P.TLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}ст _KIT-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}м _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} _KIT-Tenses1 ;
@P.KLOSS.ON@+Pl+Gen+PxPl1:@P.KLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-Tenses1 ;
@P.KLOSS.ON@+Pl+Gen+PxPl2:@P.KLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}нк _LAK-Tenses1 ;
@P.TLOSS.ON@+Pl+Gen+PxPl3:@P.TLOSS.ON@%>%{оеэØ%}ст _KIT-Tenses1 ;


+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь _OSH-Tenses1 ;
+Sg+Nom+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}сь _OSH-Tenses1 ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нть Ks ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нтень Ks ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нть Ks ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нтень Ks ;
+Ill:%>з _OSH-Possessive-Before-K ;
+Ill:%>%{оеэØ%}з _OSH-Possessive-Before-K ;


+SP+Abl:%>%{дт%}О1 _KUDO-Possessive-Before-K ;
+SP+Abl:%>%{оеэØ%}%{дт%}О1 _KUDO-Possessive-Before-K ;
+SP+Gen:%>%{оеэØ%}нь _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+SP+Dat:%>%{оеэØ%}нень Ks ;
+SP+Ill:%>с Ks ;
+SP+Gen:%>%{оеэØ%}нь _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+SP+Ill:%>%{оеэØ%}%>с Ks ;

+Sg+Prl+Def:%>Г2а%>нть Ks ;
+Sg+Abe+Def:%>вт%{оеэ%}мО1%>нть Ks ;
+Sg+Abl+Def:%>%{дт%}О1%>нть Ks ;
+Sg+Tra+Def:%>кс%>%{оеэØ%}нть Ks ;
+Sg+Ine+Def:%>с%{оэØ%}%>нть Ks ;
+Sg+Ela+Def:%>ст%{оэØ%}%>нть Ks ;
+Sg+Cmpr+Def:%>шка%>нть Ks ;
+Sg+Tra+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}кс%>%{оеэØ%}нть Ks ;
+Sg+Ine+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}%>с%{оэØ%}%>нть Ks ;
+Sg+Ela+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}%>ст%{оэØ%}%>нть Ks ;
+Sg+Cmpr+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}шка%>нть Ks ;

+SP+Prl:%>Г2а _KUDO-Possessive-Before-K ;
+SP+Abe:%>вт%{оеэ%}мО1 _KUDO-Possessive-Before-K ;
+SP+Tra:%>кс _OSH-Possessive-Before-K ;
+SP+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Possessive-Before-K ;
+SP+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Possessive-Before-K ;
+SP+Cmpr:%>шка _KUDO-Possessive-Before-K ;
+SP+Cmpr+Com:%>шкане _KUDO-Possessive-Before-K ;
+SP+Tra:%>%{оеэØ%}кс _OSH-Possessive-Before-K ;
+SP+Ine:%>%{оеэØ%}с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Possessive-Before-K ;
+SP+Ela:%>%{оеэØ%}ст%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Possessive-Before-K ;
+SP+Cmpr:%>%{оеэØ%}шка _KUDO-Possessive-Before-K ;
+SP+Cmpr+Com:%>%{оеэØ%}шкане _KUDO-Possessive-Before-K ;

+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>VLossт%{ЬØ%} _KIT-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>NoVLossт%{ЬØ%} _KIT-Tenses1 ;
 KOLMONST-ELLIPSIS-TYPE ;

!Attributes
+SP+Prl:%>Г2а _KUDO-Attributes2 ; 
+SP+Abe:%>вт%{оеэ%}мО1 _KUDO-Attributes2 ;  
+SP+Tra:%>кс _OSH-Attributes2 ;
+SP+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Attributes2 ;  
+SP+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Attributes2 ;  
+SP+Cmpr:%>шка _KUDO-Attributes2 ;  
+SP+Tra:%>%{оеэØ%}кс _OSH-Attributes2 ;
+SP+Ine:%>%{оеэØ%}с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Attributes2 ; 
+SP+Ela:%>%{оеэØ%}ст%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Attributes2 ;
+SP+Cmpr:%>%{оеэØ%}шка _KUDO-Attributes2 ;
+Pl+Prl+Def:%>тнЕ3%>ва _KUDO-Attributes2 ; 
+Pl+Abe+Def:%>тнЕ3%>втеме _KUDO-Attributes2 ; 
+Pl+Tra+Def:%>тнЕ3%>кс _OSH-Attributes2 ; 
+Pl+Ine+Def:%>тнЕ3%>сэ _KUDO-Attributes2 ; 
+Pl+Ela+Def:%>тнЕ3%>стэ _KUDO-Attributes2 ;
+Pl+Cmpr+Def:%>тнЕ3%>шка _KUDO-Attributes2 ; 
@R.TLOSS.ON@+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@R.TLOSS.ON@ Quants3_TLOSS ;

LEXICON KOLMONST-ELLIPSIS-TYPE
+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тнЕ3 _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тнЕ3%>де Ks ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тнЕ3%>нь Ks ;
+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тнЕ3%>нень Ks ;
+Pl+Ill+Def:%>тнЕ3%>с Ks ;
+Pl+Prl+Def:%>тнЕ3%>ва _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Abe+Def:%>тнЕ3%>втеме _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Tra+Def:%>тнЕ3%>кс Ks ;
+Pl+Ine+Def:%>тнЕ3%>сэ _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Ela+Def:%>тнЕ3%>стэ _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Pl+Cmpr+Def:%>тнЕ3%>шка _KUDO-Tenses1 ;

LEXICON Quants3_TLOSS
@C.TLOSS@+Pl+Nom+Def:@C.TLOSS@%>не _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
@C.TLOSS@+Pl+Abl+Def:@C.TLOSS@%>неде Ks ;
@C.TLOSS@+Pl+Gen+Def:@C.TLOSS@%>нень Ks ;
@C.TLOSS@+Pl+Dat+Def:@C.TLOSS@%>ненень Ks ;
@C.TLOSS@+Pl+Ill+Def:@C.TLOSS@%>нес Ks ;

@C.TLOSS@+Pl+Prl+Def:@C.TLOSS@%>нева _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
@C.TLOSS@+Pl+Abe+Def:@C.TLOSS@%>невтеме _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
@C.TLOSS@+Pl+Tra+Def:@C.TLOSS@%>некс Ks ;
@C.TLOSS@+Pl+Ine+Def:@C.TLOSS@%>несэ _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
@C.TLOSS@+Pl+Ela+Def:@C.TLOSS@%>нестэ _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
@C.TLOSS@+Pl+Cmpr+Def:@C.TLOSS@%>нешка _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
@C.TLOSS@+Pl+Prl+Def:@C.TLOSS@%>нева _KUDO-Attributes2 ;
@C.TLOSS@+Pl+Abe+Def:@C.TLOSS@%>невтеме _KUDO-Attributes2 ;
@C.TLOSS@+Pl+Tra+Def:@C.TLOSS@%>некс _OSH-Attributes2 ;
@C.TLOSS@+Pl+Ine+Def:@C.TLOSS@%>несэ _KUDO-Attributes2 ;
@C.TLOSS@+Pl+Ela+Def:@C.TLOSS@%>нестэ _KUDO-Attributes2 ;
@C.TLOSS@+Pl+Cmpr+Def:@C.TLOSS@%>нешка _KUDO-Attributes2 ;

!! 2012-08-09
!LEXICON Attributes1
! Attributes2 ;
!+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>т%{ЬØ%}  _KIT-Tenses1 ;
!+Sg+Ela+Indef:%>ст%{оэØ%} Ks ;
!+Sg+Tra+Indef:%>кс Ks ;
!+Pl+Ela+Indef:%>ст%{оэØ%} Ks ;
!+Pl+Tra+Indef:%>кс Ks ;
!+Sg+Nom+Indef: Ks ;


LEXICON _KUDO-Attributes2
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь _OSH-Tenses1 ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def:%>нть Ks ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+Def:%>нтень Ks ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>т%{ЬØ%} _KIT-Tenses1 ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тнЕ3 _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Indef:%>нь _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def:%>Г2а%>нть Ks ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def:%>вт%{оеэ%}мО1%>нть Ks ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def:%>%{дт%}О1%>нть Ks ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def:%>кс%>%{оеэØ%}нть Ks ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def:%>с%{оэØ%}%>нть Ks ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def:%>ст%{оэØ%}%>нть Ks ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Cmpr+Def:%>шка%>нть Ks ;
 Attributes2_PL ;

LEXICON _OSH-Attributes2
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}сь _OSH-Tenses1 ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нть Ks ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нтень Ks ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Indef:%>%{оеэØ%}нь _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}кс%>%{оеэØ%}нть Ks ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}с%{оэØ%}%>нть Ks ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}ст%{оэØ%}%>нть Ks ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Cmpr+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}шка%>нть Ks ;
 Attributes2_PL ;

LEXICON Attributes2_PL
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тнЕ3%>де Ks ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тнЕ3%>нь Ks ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тнЕ3%>нень Ks ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def:%>тнЕ3%>с Ks ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def:%>тнЕ3%>ва _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def:%>тнЕ3%>втеме _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def:%>тнЕ3%>кс Ks ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def:%>тнЕ3%>сэ _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def:%>тнЕ3%>стэ _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Der+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Cmpr+Def:%>тнЕ3%>шка _KUDO-Tenses1 ;




LEXICON vese-QNT
: _KUDO-Misc_Pronouns_Sg ;
: Misc_Pronouns_Pl ;
!+Det+Attr: ENDLEX ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
